Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 73.
ARKANSAS TERM LIMITATION AMENDMENT.

Preamble: The people of Arkansas find and declare that elected officials who remain in office too long become preoccupied with reelection and ignore their duties as representatives of the people. Entrenched incumbency has reduced voter participation and has led to an electoral system that is less free, less competitive, and less representative than the system established by the Founding Fathers. Therefore, the people of Arkansas, exercising their reserved powers, herein limit the terms of elected officials.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 1150, § 1, provided:

“There is hereby created the ‘Committee on Amendment 73 Implementation’ to be composed of up to seven (7) members of the Senate. The members of the Senate shall be selected by the Senate President Pro Tempore, at least two of which are serving their first term and at least two of which are serving their second term. The members of the committee shall elect a chairman.

“The members of the committee shall be entitled to per diem and mileage at the same rates as are provided for the members of the joint interim committees and such per diem and mileage shall be paid from funds appropriated for paying per diem and mileage of members of the joint interim committees. The committee is eligible to receive funds for consultant services and other expenses from the Joint Interim Committee Study Expense appropriation under the same restrictions and procedures as joint interim committees. Staff assistance to the committee is to be provided by the Bureau of Legislative Research as approved by the Executive Committee of the Arkansas Legislative Council.

“The committee shall conduct a study to determine any rule or statutory changes that might be necessary or desirable in order to implement Amendment 73 of the Arkansas Constitution. The committee shall report its recommendations to the Senate on or before January 1, 1997.”

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition and approved at the 1992 general election by a vote of 494,326 for and 330,836 against.

Section 3 of this amendment was declared unconstitutional in U.S. Term Limits, Inc. v. Hill, 316 Ark. 251, 872 S.W.2d 349 (1994).

Section 3 of this Amendment has been amended by Ark. Const. Amend. 76.

Cross References.

House of Representatives, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 2.

Senate, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 3.

§ 1. Executive Branch.

The Executive Department of this State shall consist of a Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, Attorney General, and Commissioner of State Lands, all of whom shall keep their offices at the seat of government, and hold their offices for the term of four years, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

No elected officials of the Executive Department of this State may serve in the same office more than two such four year terms.

§ 2. Legislative Branch.

The Arkansas House of Representatives shall consist of members to be chosen every second year by the qualified electors of the several counties.

The Arkansas Senate shall consist of members to be chosen every four years by the qualified electors of the several districts.

A member of the General Assembly shall serve no more than sixteen (16) years, whether consecutive or nonconsecutive.

A member who completes his or her sixteenth year of service during a term of office for which he or she has been elected may serve until the completion of that term of office.

The years of service in both the Senate and the House of Representatives shall be added together and included to determine the total number of years in office.

A partial legislative term served as a result of a special election under Article 5, § 6, or a two-year term served as a result of apportionment of the Senate shall not be included in calculating the total number of years served by a member of the General Assembly. [As amended by Const. Amend. 94.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which amended this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Before amendment, this section read:

“§ 2. Legislative Branch.

“(a) The Arkansas House of Representatives shall consist of members to be chosen every second year by the qualified electors of the several counties. No member of the Arkansas House of Representatives may serve more than three such two year terms.

“(b) The Arkansas Senate shall consist of members to be chosen every four years by the qualified electors of the several districts. No member of the Arkansas Senate may serve more than two such four year terms.”

§ 3. Congressional Delegation.

Any person having been elected to three or more terms as a member of the United States House of Representatives from Arkansas shall not be certified as a candidate and shall not be eligible to have his/her name placed on the ballot for election to the United States House of Representatives from Arkansas.

Any person having been elected to two or more terms as a member of the United States Senate from Arkansas shall not be certified as a candidate and shall not be eligible to have his/her name placed on the ballot for election to the United States Senate from Arkansas.

Publisher's Notes.

This section was declared unconstitutional in U.S. Term Limits, Inc. v. Hill, 316 Ark. 251, 872 S.W.2d 349 (1994).

This section has been amended by Ark. Const. Amend. 76.

§ 4. Severability.

The provisions of this Amendment are severable, and if any should be held invalid, the remainder shall stand.

Section Held Severable.

A reading of Ark. Const. Amend. 73, §§ 1, 2, and 3, shows that they are grammatically independent and functionally independent; although what the people voted for in adopting this amendment was a theme or concept — the limitation of service terms for persons in public office — the fact that one category of persons is eliminated from that adopted amendment does not mean that the voters did not intend it to apply to the remaining two categories, and the striking of Ark. Const. Amend. 73, § 3, does not invalidate the rest of this amendment. United States Term Limits, Inc. v. Hill, 316 Ark. 251, 872 S.W.2d 349 (1994), aff'd, sub nom. United States Term Limits, Inc. v. Thornton, 514 U.S. 779, 115 S. Ct. 1842, 131 L. Ed. 2d 881 (1995).

§ 5. Provisions Self-executing.

Provisions of this Amendment shall be self-executing.

§ 6. Application.

This Amendment to the Arkansas Constitution shall take effect and be in operation on January 1, 1993, and its provisions shall be applicable to all person thereafter seeking election to the offices specified in this Amendment.

All laws and constitutional provisions which conflict with this Amendment are hereby repealed to the extent that they conflict with this amendment.